Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1,112
Refusal to submit to physical or mental examination or chemical dependency evaluation; effect.

Refusal of an applicant or credential holder to submit to a physical or mental examination or chemical dependency evaluation requested by the appropriate board or the department pursuant to section 38-1,110 or 38-1,111 to determine his or her qualifications to practice or to continue in the practice of the profession for which application was made or for which he or she is credentialed by the department shall be just cause for denial of the application or for refusal of renewal or suspension of his or her credential automatically by the director until such examination or evaluation has been made.

Laws 1976, LB 877, § 20;

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 67;

Laws 1986, LB 579, § 59;

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 44;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 395;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 51;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-161.15;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 112.